de: Kolophoniumrezeptur/-zusätze: Griffverbessernde Mischung; Hypoallergen; Staubarm; Metallversetzt; Standard; Synthetisch/vegan; Wachsfrei; Sonstige
sv: Rosinformel / tillsatser: Greppförbättrande blandning; Allergivänlig; Lågdammande; Metallinfuserad; Standard; Syntetisk/vegansk; Vaxfri; Övrigt
ja: ロジンの配合成分／添加物: グリップ強化ブレンド; 低刺激性; 低粉塵; 金属配合; スタンダード; 合成 / ヴィーガン; ワックスフリー; その他
ko: 송진 배합/첨가제: 그립 강화 블렌드; 저자극성; 가루날림 적음; 금속 성분 첨가; 표준; 합성/비건; 무왁스; 기타
bg-BG: Формула / добавки за колофон: Смес за по-добро сцепление; Хипоалергенен; С ниско отделяне на прах; С добавен метал; Стандартен; Синтетичен/веган; Без восък; Друго
zh-CN: 松香配方/添加剂: 增强握力混合配方; 低致敏性; 低粉尘; 含金属成分; 标准; 合成/纯素; 无蜡; 其他
tr: Reçine formülü / katkı maddeleri: Kavrama artırıcı karışım; Hipoalerjenik; Düşük toz; Metal katkılı; Standart; Sentetik/vegan; Mumsuz; Diğer
lt-LT: Kanifolijos formulė / priedai: Sukibimą gerinantis mišinys; Hipoalerginė; Mažo dulkingumo; Su metalo priemaišomis; Standartinė; Sintetinė / veganiška; Be vaško; Kita
th: สูตรเรซิน / สารเติมแต่ง: สูตรผสมเพิ่มการยึดเกาะ; สูตรไฮโปอัลเลอร์เจนิก; ฝุ่นน้อย; ผสมโลหะ; มาตรฐาน; วัสดุสังเคราะห์/วีแกน; ปราศจากแว็กซ์; อื่นๆ
nl: Hars formule / additieven: Gripverhogende mix; Hypoallergeen; Stofarm; Met metaal verrijkt; Standaard; Synthetisch/veganistisch; Wasvrij; Overige
ro-RO: Formulă/aditivi pentru sacâz: Amestec pentru aderență; Hipoalergenic; Praf redus; Infuzat cu metal; Standard; Sintetic/vegan; Fără ceară; Altele
hu: Gyantaösszetétel / adalékanyagok: Tapadásnövelő keverék; Hipoallergén; Alacsony porképződésű; Fémmel dúsított; Normál; Szintetikus / vegán; Viaszmentes; Egyéb
it: Formula della colofonia / additivi: Miscela per migliorare la presa; Ipoallergenica; A bassa emissione di polvere; Infusa con metallo; Standard; Sintetica/vegana; Senza cera; Altro
ru: Формула канифоли/добавки: Смесь для улучшения сцепления; Гипоаллергенная; Низкий уровень пыли; Металлизированная; Стандартная; Синтетическая/веганская; Без воска; Другое
sk-SK: Zloženie/prísady kolofónie: Zmes na zlepšenie úchopu; Hypoalergénna; S nízkou prašnosťou; S prímesou kovu; Štandardná; Syntetická/vegánska; Bez vosku; Iné
pt-PT: Fórmula da resina/aditivos: Mistura para melhorar a aderência; Hipoalergénico; Baixo nível de pó; Com infusão de metal; Padrão; Sintético/vegan; Sem cera; Outro
es: Fórmula y aditivios de la resina: Mezcla para mejorar el agarre; Hipoalergénico; Polvo bajo; Con infusión de metal; Estándar; Sintético/vegano; Sin cera; Otro
vi: Công thức/phụ gia nhựa thông: Hỗn hợp tăng cường độ bám; Ít gây dị ứng; Ít bụi; Có chứa kim loại; Tiêu chuẩn; Tổng hợp/thuần chay; Không sáp; Khác
cs: Vzorec kalafuny / přísady: Směs pro lepší přilnavost; Hypoalergenní; Snížená prašnost; S příměsí kovu; Standardní; Syntetická/veganská; Bez vosku; Jiné
el: Σύνθεση / πρόσθετα κολοφωνίου: Μείγμα για ενίσχυση λαβής; Υποαλλεργική; Χαμηλή σκόνη; Με προσθήκη μετάλλου; Τυπική; Συνθετική/Vegan; Χωρίς κερί; Άλλο
zh-TW: 松香配方/添加劑: 增強抓力的混合配方; 低敏; 低粉塵; 含金屬成分; 標準; 合成/純素; 不含蠟; 其他
fr: Formule ou additifs de la colophane: Mélange améliorant l’adhérence; Hypoallergénique; Faible émission de poussière; Infusé de métal; Standard; Synthétique/végane; Sans cire; Autre
pt-BR: Breu fórmula/aditivos: Mistura para aumentar a aderência; Hipoalergênica; Baixo teor de pó; Com infusão de metal; Padrão; Sintética/vegana; Sem cera; Outro
en: Rosin formula / additives: Grip-enhancing blend; Hypoallergenic; Low dust; Metal-infused; Standard; Synthetic/vegan; Wax-free; Other
fi: Hartsin koostumus/lisäaineet: Pitoa parantava seos; Hypoallergeeninen; Vähäpölyinen; Metallivahvisteinen; Vakio; Synteettinen/vegaaninen; Vahaton; Muu
pl: Formuła/dodatki kalafonii: Mieszanka poprawiająca chwyt; Hipoalergiczna; Niskopyląca; Z domieszką metali; Standardowa; Syntetyczna/wegańska; Bez wosku; Inne
hr-HR: Formula/ aditivi za smolu: Mješavina za bolje prianjanje; Hipoalergeno; Niska razina prašine; S dodatkom metala; Standardna; Sintetičko / vegansko; Bez voska; Ostalo
da: Harpiksformulering/tilsætningsstoffer: Grebsforbedrende blanding; Hypoallergen; Minimal støvdannelse; Metalinfuseret; Standard; Syntetisk/vegansk; Voksfri; Andet
nb: Harpiksformel/-tilsetningsstoffer: Grepsforbedrende blanding; Hypoallergenisk; Lite støv; Metallinfusert; Standard; Syntetisk/vegansk; Voksfri; Annet
sl-SI: Sestava/aditivi kolofonije: Mešanica za boljši oprijem; Hipoalergena; Malo prahu; Z dodano kovino; Standardna; Sintetična/veganska; Brez voska; Drugo